src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
"ä:0"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
! 1. "Shortening of long vowel in front of i"
! 2. "Stem deletion in h-illative"
! 3. superlative
 ä:0 <=>       Cns:+ _ (%^WG:) (%^AO:) %> i3: ; ! lenttäät:lensin
        Cns:+ (:Cns) _ (Dial:) (%^WG:) (%^A0:) %> i2: ; ! häntä:hänttiin, pykälä:pykälissä
                     _ %> ([Dummy: - %^AE:]) i5: ; ! 3.
                     _ ä %> ([Dummy: - %^AE:]) [ i | i2: | i3: | i4:] ; ! 1.
            ä _ %^VDEL:0  (Dummy:) %> [s|t] ;
  :SurfaceCns _ (%^E2I:) %^HMETA: %> h [:ä|i:] ; 
  :SurfaceCns _                   %> h i i %> n  ; ! päivä>hiin : päiv0hiin
  :SurfaceCns _  %^AO:   %^HMETA: %> h (%^V:) ([:o|:ö]) %> i2: ; ! 2.
  :i          _ (%^AO:)  %^HMETA: %> h (%^V:) (%>) (:o)(:o) (i2:) ; ! 2.

  :SurfaceCns (Vow:*) _ (Dial:) ([%^E2I:|%^AO:]) %^HMETA:  %> h [:ä|i:] ;
  :SurfaceCns (Vow:*) _ (Dial:)  %^AO:   %^HMETA:  %> h (%^V:) (:o) %> i2: ;
  :i          _ (Dial:) (%^AO:)  %^HMETA:  %> h (%^V:) (%>) (:o)(:o) (i2:) ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ kehä>i2>ss^A
!!€ keh0>i>ssä
!!€ päivä>i2>in
!!€ päiv0>i>in
!!€ jyv0ä>i2>in
!!€ jyvv0>i>in
!!$ kehä>i2>ss^A
!!$ kehä>i>ssä
!!€ pää>i2>ss^A
!!€ p0ä>i>ssä


"ö:0"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
ö:0 <=>
           _ ö %> ([Dummy: - %^AE:]) [ i | i2: | i3: | i4:] ; ! Shortening of long vowel in front of i. Miljöö:miljöissä.

"o:0"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
o:0 <=>
           _ o %> ([Dummy: - %^AE:]) [ i | i2: | i3: | i4:] ; ! Shortening of long vowel in front of i. samppoo:samppoissa.



!%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%
!! ## Gemination tests

! TODO TODO TODO e:i i2:i and ^V:i ??? Fix this. d: Easter 2018
!            j o k _ e:i %^Por %> i2:i %> %^V n ;
!            j o k _ e:i %^Por %> i2:i %> %^V # ;
!            p     o     i6:i         k _              a:i %^A2I:0   %> i2:i       %> n ; ! gen_n   since we have the i
!            p     o     i6:i         k _              a:i %^A2I:0   %> i2:i       # ; !  since we have the i
 ! removed the /a, so not a:a, keep in mind if strange bugs appear. used2be [:o|:i|\a]
 ! should not be any ^WG in these context, not in gen and par.
 ! TODO TODO TODO find alternative to .#. at the end. Maybe NOT > or something similar? Answer: use just #
 ! akkoin akkoi mutta aikoina aikoine. .#. ei toimi niin kuin pitäisä. Miksi? TODO TODO sama sanassa poika
 ! jokkii,sannoi,nykkiit. Maybe \EÄA. Used2nothave Cns @start be4 merger.
 ! Also Cns Vow k _ i %> %^V: ;!sippiit but ^V is always :i,right?

! removed the /a, so not a:a, keep in mind if strange bugs appear. used2be [:o|:i|\a]
! should not be any ^WG in these context, not in gen and par.
! TODO TODO TODO find alternative to .#. at the end. Maybe NOT > or something similar?
! akkoin akkoi mutta aikoina aikoine. .#. ei toimi niin kuin pitäisä. Miksi? TODO TODO sama sanassa poika
! jokkii,sannoi,nykkiit. Maybe \EÄA. Used2nothave Cns @start be4 merger.
! Also Cns Vow p _ i %> %^V: ;!sippiit but ^V is always :i,right?

! TODO Uncomment and fix ^A: issues in a:o and kkpp in general
!   !!$ kuva^A0>i2
!   !!$ kuva0>i
!   !!$ kuva^A0>i2>n
!   !!$ kuva0>i>n
!   !!$ kuva^A0>i2>n^A
!   !!$ kuva0>i>na
!   !!$ poi6ka^A0>i2>n^A
!   !!$ poika0>i>na
!   !!€ kuva^A0>i2>n^A
!   !!€ kuv00>i>na
!   !!€ poi6ka^A0>i2>n^A
!   !!€ poik00>i>na

!!$ kuv0a^A0>i2>n^A
!!$ kuvvi0>i>na
!!$ poi6ka^A0>i2>n^A
!!$ poiki0>i>na

!!$ poi6ka^A2I>i2>n
!!$ poika0>i>n
!!$ poi6ka^A2I>i2
!!$ poika0>i

! !!€ aik0a^Por^AO>i2>n
! !!€ aikko 0   0 >i>n
! !!$ aika^Por^AO>i2>n
! !!$ aiko00>i>n
! Miks tää menee läpi? TODO Ask about the nature of 0:something and these negational Rules
! How to make sure 0:k exists and NOT the base 0:0?

! TODO Seems to work in lexc?
! !!€ aik0a^Por^AO>i2
! !!€ aikko00>i

! !!$ aika^Por^AO>i2
! !!$ aiko00>i
! Miks tää menee läpi? TODO Ask about the nature of 0:something and these negational Rules
! How to make sure 0:k exists and NOT the base 0:0?

!!€ aika^Por^AO>i2>n^A
!!€ aiko00>i>na
!!€ aika^Por^AO>i2>ne
!!€ aiko00>i>ne

!!€ kuv0a^Por^A2I>i2>n
!!€ kuvvi00>i>n
!!€ kuv0a^Por^A2I>i2
!!€ kuvvi00>i

!!€ kuva^Por^A0>i2>ne
!!€ kuv000>i>ne
!!$ kuv0a^Por^A0>i2>ne
!!$ kuvvi00>i>ne
!!$ kuva^Por^A0>i2>ne
!!$ kuva00>i>ne

!!€ poi6ka^Por^A0>i2>ne
!!€ poik000>i>ne
!!$ poi6ka^Por^A0>i2>ne
!!$ poika00>i>ne
!!$ poi6ka^Por^A0>i2>ne
!!$ poiki00>i>ne

!!$ poi6ka^A2I>i2>n
!!$ poika0>i>n

!!€ sop0i>^V
!!€ soppi>i

!!€ vuot0e>i2>^V>n
!!€ vuoss0>i>i>n

!!$ vuot0e>i2>^V>n
!!$ vuott0>i>i>n

!!€ housu>i2>le
!!€ housu>i>le

!!€ hirt0e>i2>^V
!!€ hirss0>i>i

!!$ hirt0e>i2>^V
!!$ hirtt0>i>i

!!€ ant0a>^Vt
!!€ antta>at

!!€ ant0a>^V
!!€ antta>a

! !!$ anta^AO>i3
! !!$ anto0>i

!!€ ant0a>^V>v^A
!!€ antta>a>va

!!€ ant0a>^V>v^At
!!€ antta>a>vat

!!€ aik0a^Por>^V
!!€ aikka0>a

!!€ kiv0e>i2>^V
!!€ kivv0>i>i

! !!€ kuv0a^Por^AO>i2
! !!€ kuvvi00>i
! TODO TODO TODO, should we have a:i i2:i n? Not consistent with some others, where we have a:0 i2:i i n

!! **Tests:**
!!€ kal0a>^V
!!€ kalla>a
! kuva is ^V in Por and ^A in -Por
!!€ kuv0a>^V
!!€ kuvva>a
!!€ suome>^V
!!€ suome>e
!!€ lauk0e>^V
!!€ laukke>e
!!€ tek0e>^V
!!€ tekke>e
!!€ kat0o>^V>t
!!€ katto>o>t
!!€ kal0a^Por^AO>i2
!!€ kallo00>i
!!€ kir0o>^V>t
!!€ kirro>o>t
! TODO Seems to work in lexc?
!!€ san0a^AO>i2
!!€ sanno0>i
!!€ jout0u>^V
!!€ jouttu>u
!!€ puh0u>^V
!!€ puhhu>u
!!€ näk0y>^V
!!€ näkky>y
!!€ lev0y>^V
!!€ levvy>y
!!€ näk0ö>^V
!!€ näkkö>ö
!!€ pör0ö>^V
!!€ pörrö>ö
!!$ perin0ö^WG>n
!!$ perinnö0>n
!!€ tiet0ä>^Vt
!!€ tiettä>ät
!!€ as0u>^Vt
!!€ assu>ut
!!€ el0ä>^V
!!€ ellä>ä
!!€ jalk0a>^V
!!€ jalkka>a
!!€ järk0e>^V
!!€ järkke>e
!!€ murt0o>^V
!!€ murtto>o
!!€ polk0u>^V
!!€ polkku>u
!!€ särk0y>^V
!!€ särkky>y
!!€ lämp0ö>^V
!!€ lämppö>ö
!!€ pölk0ä>^V
!!€ pölkkä>ä
!!€ härk0ä>^V
!!€ härkkä>ä
!!€ kerk0i>^Vn
!!€ kerkki>in
!!€ lauk0e>i7s
!!€ laukke>is
!!€ särk0y>i7s
!!€ särkky>is



!%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%

! The old a rules for refernce




!"i:0 in past tense and conditional of i-stems" ! leikin, tohtisin
! i:0 <=> Cns: _ Dummy:* %> [ i3:i | i4:i ] ;





!old a rules "a:0 before Pret and Pl i when rounded root vowel"
!old a rules !! __@RULENAME@__
!old a rules
!old a rules a:0 <=> (\a) [(u) u|([u|o]) o] (i) Cns: (Cns:) (Cns:) _  [(Dummy:* - %^AE:) %>  [i2:|i3:] | [a:0]] ;
!old a rules
!old a rules !a:0 <=> \a [(u) u|([u|o]) o] (i) Cns: (Cns:) (Cns:) _  ([Dummy: - %^AE:]) %> !Dummy:* [i2:|i3:] ;
!old a rules ! a:0 <=>          [u|o]     (i) Cns: (Cns:) (Cns:) _ (Dummy:) %> [i2:|i3:] ;
!old a rules
!old a rules
!old a rules !!€ otta^WG>i2n
!old a rules !!€ o0t000in
!old a rules
!old a rules
!old a rules "a:o before Pl i and Pret i"
!old a rules !! __@RULENAME@__
!old a rules !a:o <=> .#. (Cns:*) [i|e|a] \o \u Cns:* (:Cns) %> %^AO:o a:o _ %> [i2:i | i3:i ] ; ! 2-syll
!old a rules a:o <=> .#. (Cns:*) [Vow: - [o|u]] [i|e|a] Cns:* (:Cns) (%^AO:0) _  %> [i2: | i3: ] ; !2-syll
!old a rules
!old a rules !a:o / <= .#. (Cns:*) [Vow: - [o|u]] [i|e|a] Cns:* (:Cns) %^AO:0 _ %> i [a:a] ; !2-syll
!old a rules
!old a rules !"a never o in front of i:i"
!old a rules !! __@RULENAME@__
!old a rules !a:o /<= (.#.) (Cns:*) a:a (\%>) _  i:i ;
!old a rules
!old a rules !a:o /<= a _ (\%>) i ;
!old a rules
!old a rules        ! .#. Cns:* [Vow: - [o|u]] [i|e|a] Cns:* (:Cns) [Dummy: - %^AE:] _ %^AO:0 [ i2:| i3: ] ;
!old a rules ! Vow Cns Cns:* [Vow: - [o|u]] [i|e|a] Cns:+ (:Cns)[Dummy: - %^AE:] _ [Dummy: - %^AE:] %> [i2: | i3:] ; !3-syll
!old a rules
!old a rules ! a:o <=>  .#. Cns:* ([Vow: - [a|o|u]]) [i|e|a] Cns:* (:Cns) _ [Dummy: - %^AE:] %> !i2: ; ! 2-syll
!old a rules !          .#. Cns:* ([Vow: - [a|o|u]]) [i|e|a] Cns:* (:Cns) _  %^AO:0 ;
!old a rules !    Vow Cns Cns:* ([Vow  - [a|o|u]]) [i|e|a] Cns:+ (:Cns) _ [Dummy: - %^AE:] %> i2: ; ! 3-syll
!old a rules !    Vow Cns Cns:* ([Vow  - [a|o|u]]) Vow   Cns:+ (:Cns) _ [Dummy: - %^AE:] %> i2: ; ! 3-syll
!old a rules !          .#. Cns:*   a                  ([a|u]) Cns:* (:Cns) _ [Dummy: - %^AE:] %> i3: ;
!old a rules
!old a rules
!old a rules !!€ kal0a>i2en
!old a rules !!€ kallo0ien
!old a rules
!old a rules
!old a rules !!€ kulkkiija>i2
!old a rules !!€ kulkkiijo0i
!old a rules
!old a rules !"a:o for HMETA"
!old a rules ! %^V:o <=> .#. Cns:* a ([a|u]) Cns:* (:Cns) [Dummy: - %^AE:] %^HMETA: 0%> h _ %^AO:0 ;



!"Gemination"
! 0:Cx <=> [Vow|l|r] Cy _ Vow: %> Vow: ;
!        where Cy in ( h j k l m n p r s t v )
!              Cx in ( h j k l m n p r s t v )
!    matched;

!"Gemination of h"
!0:h <=> [ .#. | Cns ] Vow h _ :Vx %> :Vx ;
!         where Vx in ( a e i o u ä ö ) ;
!
!"Gemination of l"
!0:l <=> [ .#. | Cns ] Vow h _ :Vx %> :Vx ;
!         where Vx in ( a e i o u ä ö ) ;


!   "Gemination VVXi"
!0:Cx <=> Cns:*  Vow:+ (Vow) Cx _ [ Vow | a:o ] %> [:i | i2:i];
!                                         _ [ a:0 | e:0 ]  %> :i i2:i ;
!      where Cx in ( k p t s ) ;

! "a:o before Pl i and Pret i"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
!a:o <=>        .#.   (Cns:*) ([Vow: - [o|u]]) [i|e|a] Cns:* (:Cns) (%^AO:0) _                    %> [i2: | i3: ] ; !2-syll
! a:o <=>  [ #: | .#. ] Cns:* ([i|e|a]         ) [i|e|a] Cns:*  :Cns           _ (Dummy: - %^AE:0) %> [i2: | i3: ] ;
!  a:o <=>               Cns:* ([i|e|a]         ) [i|e|a] Cns:*  :Cns          _ (Dummy: - %^AE:0) %> [i2: | i3: ] ;
!                                                  (:Cns) [ :k | :l] (:i) :i :j _ (Dummy:*) i2: ;





!"Shortening of long vowel when vowel lengthening"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
! %^V:0 <=> Vow %> _ %> [ i3:i | i4:i ] ;

! Tämä sääntö aiheuttaa paljon ratkaisemattomia konflikteja säännön "Vow copying" kanssa.
! Mikä tämä sääntö on ja miten se eroaa edelisestä "Shortening of long vowel in front of i"?
! soppiit: sopi: sopisi
! juttaat: juti : jutaisi?
! saa∂a: sai : saisin
! jää∂ä : jäin : jäisin
! Poistettu toistaiseksi


!"a deletion in h-illative of a-stems"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
! a:0 <=> Cns _ %^AO: %^HMETA: 0%> h %^V: i2: ;

! oppettaajhiin
